Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.100

Assessments by board—Biennial report to legislature and governor.

The board shall, by January 1, 1996, and biennially thereafter: (1) Assess the total demand for training from the perspective of workers, and from the perspective of employers; (2) assess the available supply of publicly and privately provided training which workers and employers are demanding; (3) assess the costs to the state of meeting the demand; and (4) present the legislature and the governor with a strategy for bridging the gap between the supply and the demand for training services.

[ 1995 c 130 s 5.]